Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2347.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "cost" and "project" in section 2801-C of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:SECTION 1. THE HEADING OF ARTICLE XXVIII-C OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, IS AMENDED TO READ:ARTICLE XXVIII-CENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING AUTHORITY AND EMERGENCY POWERSSECTION 2. THE DEFINITIONS OF "AUTHORITY," "COST" AND "PROJECT" IN SECTION 2801-C OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 2801-C. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"AUTHORITY" MEANS THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING AUTHORITY.* * *"Cost" means the expense of construction and the expense of acquisition of all structures, equipment, fixtures, lands and other property rights and interests in land necessary to a project. The term also includes the expense of demolishing, removing or relocating any buildings, equipment, fixtures or structures on lands acquired or to be acquired, including the expense of acquiring any lands to which such buildings, equipment, fixtures or structures may be moved or relocated; storm water management; sewage treatment, waste treatment and pollution control facilities; [railroad sidings, spurs or branch lines;] all labor, materials, machinery, fixtures and 20260HB2347PN3178 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment[, fixtures]; financing charges; interest on all bonds prior to and during construction, and for a period of one year thereafter; engineering, financial and legal services; plans, specifications, studies, surveys necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing a project; administrative expenses; reserves for interest and for extension, enlargements, additions and improvements; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the construction of the project and the placing of the same in operation[.], including expenses for energy audits, environmental and geotechnical surveys, permits and other necessary approvals, planning and financing.* * *"Project" means [an] a structure, fixture, real or other property or property right or interest, facility, undertaking or activity, entirely or largely located or conducted in Pennsylvania, which cannot be effectively funded using privately available resources, relating to:(1) basic and applied research concerning energy use, renewable energy resources and energy extraction, transmission, storage or conversion;(2) limited scale demonstration of innovative or commercially unproven technology to promote the production, use or conservation of energy; [or](3) activities to promote or remove obstacles to the utilization and transportation of Pennsylvania energy resources, including but not limited to limited scale synthetic fuel facilities and the conversion or technological improvement of industrial, commercial or agricultural systems to utilize Pennsylvania INDIGENOUS ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING coal or 20260HB2347PN3178 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewable energy resources: Provided, That no such facility unreasonably interferes with private waste recycling industries[.];(4) the development, generation, conservation, management, delivery or storage of renewable energy resources for residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, agricultural, transportation or cogeneration use on an individual or aggregated basis; or(5) the strengthening of the resiliency of infrastructure that supports the development, generation, conservation, management, delivery, storage or efficient use of energy.Section 2. Section 2803-C(b)(1), (2), (3) and (4) and (d) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2803-C. Energy Development Authority.--* * *SECTION 3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 2801.1-C. REDESIGNATION OF AUTHORITY.--(A) THE ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE ENERGY FINANCING AUTHORITY.(B) A REFERENCE IN A STATUTE, REGULATION, CONTRACT, AGREEMENT, CERTIFICATION, REGISTRATION, APPLICATION OR LEGAL OR GOVERNMENTAL DOCUMENT TO THE ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE A REFERENCE TO THE ENERGY FINANCING AUTHORITY.(C) THE REDESIGNATION OF THE AUTHORITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL NOT AFFECT THE POWERS, DUTIES, OBLIGATIONS, RIGHTS, LIABILITIES, CLAIMS, DEFENSES OR OFFICIAL ACTIONS OF THE AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY MAY CONTINUE TO IDENTIFY ITSELF AS THE ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF LITIGATION COMMENCED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(D) A CERTIFICATE, CONTRACT, AGREEMENT, DEED, FORM, 20260HB2347PN3178 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPLICATION, LICENSE, PERMIT, NOTICE, CERTIFICATION, REGISTRATION, STATIONERY OR OTHER DOCUMENT ISSUED, EXECUTED OR USED BY THE AUTHORITY UNDER THE NAME ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY SHALL REMAIN VALID AND EFFECTIVE UNTIL REVISED, REPLACED OR EXHAUSTED. THE AUTHORITY MAY CONTINUE TO USE THE NAME ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ON DOCUMENTS, MATERIALS AND OTHER PROPERTY UNTIL THE AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT REPLACEMENT IS APPROPRIATE IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS.(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED TO REPLACE SIGNAGE, ELECTRONIC SYSTEMS OR OTHER MATERIALS SOLELY TO REFLECT THE REDESIGNATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A), BUT MAY MAKE THOSE CHANGES IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS OR AS PART OF A SCHEDULED UPGRADE, REPLACEMENT OR MAINTENANCE CYCLE.SECTION 4. SECTION 2803-C HEADING, (A), (B)(1), (2), (3) AND (4) AND (D) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 2803-C. ENERGY [Development] FINANCING AUTHORITY.--(A) THERE IS HEREBY ESTABLISHED THE ENERGY [Development] FINANCING AUTHORITY.(b) The authority shall be governed and all of its corporate powers exercised by a board of directors which shall be composed of the following individuals:(1) [Nine] Five members to be appointed by the Governor[, one of whom shall be designated as chairman]. At least two members shall be members of the general public. The members initially appointed shall serve for terms of two, three and four years, respectively, the particular term of each to be designated by the Governor at the time of appointment. The terms of all of their successors shall be four years each, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the 20260HB2347PN3178 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unexpired term. Every member's term shall extend until his successor is appointed and qualified. Any appointment of a member of the authority shall be subject to the advice and consent of a majority of all of the members of the Senate. Any appointed member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.(2) The Secretary of Environmental [Resources or his] Protection or the secretary's designee.(3) The Secretary of [Banking or his] Conservation and Natural Resources or the secretary's designee.(4) The Secretary of [Commerce or his] Community and Economic Development or the secretary's designee.* * *(d) The board of directors shall provide for the holding of regular and special meetings. [Ten] Eight directors attending shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business and at least [six] five votes shall be required to adopt any action, except that at least [nine] seven votes shall be required to approve financial assistance for any project.(e) The Governor shall designate a member of the board to serve as chairperson. The members shall select from among themselves other officers as the members deem necessary.Section 3. Section 2805-C of the act is amended to read:SECTION 5. SECTION 2805-C OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 2805-C. Annual Report.--The board shall make an annual report of the authority's activities for the preceding fiscal year not later than one hundred [twenty] eighty days after the conclusion thereof to the Governor and the General Assembly. Each such report shall contain a statement of activities and a complete operating and financial statement 20260HB2347PN3178 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covering the operations of the authority during such year.Section 4. Section 2806-C(2), (11), (14) and (18) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:SECTION 6. SECTION 2806-C(1), (2), (11), (14) AND (18) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING PARAGRAPHS TO READ:Section 2806-C. Powers and Duties.--The authority, as a public corporation and governmental instrumentality exercising public powers of the Commonwealth, is hereby granted and shall have and may exercise all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this article, including the following powers, in addition to others herein granted:* * *(1) TO CONDUCT EXAMINATIONS AND INVESTIGATIONS AND TO TAKE TESTIMONY, UNDER OATH OR AFFIRMATION, AT PUBLIC OR PRIVATE HEARINGS, ON ANY MATTER MATERIAL FOR ITS INFORMATION AND NECESSARY TO THE DETERMINATION AND APPROVAL OF ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PROJECT LOAN APPLICATIONS.[(2) To have existence for a term of fifty years, or until its existence shall be terminated by law.](2.1) To have existence until the later of ten years after the effective date of this paragraph or one hundred eighty days after the authority finally pays and discharges all debts, bonds and other liabilities, including all interest due on the debts, bonds and other liabilities, and settles all other outstanding claims against the authority . * * *(11) To lease, lease with an option to purchase, sell by installment sale or otherwise, or to otherwise dispose of, any 20260HB2347PN3178 - 7 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or all of its projects, or any or all of its real or other property or property rights or interests necessary for a project, in whole or in part, for such rentals or amounts and upon such terms and conditions as the authority may deem proper.* * *(14) To [make grants] provide grants, loans, loan guarantees, rebates and dividends to fund [research] or support projects, including pilot programs for projects.* * *(18) To receive appropriations and apply for and accept grants, gifts, donations, bequests and settlements from any public, quasi-public, nonprofit or private source[.], including the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, corporation, association, partnership, nonprofit corporation, charitable organization, foundation, estate or individual. Funds received by the authority shall be deposited in the Energy Development Fund and used for the purposes of the authority. As used in this paragraph, the term "grant" includes all of the following:(i) The tax refund generated by the authority's elective payment of an applicable Federal tax credit.(ii) To the extent permitted by Federal law, a tax credit, or the total or partial dollar value of a tax refund generated by the elective payment of a tax credit, that is transferred, assigned, paid, conveyed to or shared with the authority by a public, quasi-public, nonprofit or private entity.(19) To establish, through bylaws and amendments to the bylaws, the authority's fiscal year.(20) To consider assistance to low-income and moderate-income individuals and disadvantaged communities, assistance to 20260HB2347PN3178 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 small businesses and local governmental entities and job creation, retention and training in establishing and effectuating the authority's priorities.(21) To plan, design, develop, finance, construct, own, operate, maintain and improve projects, including pilot programs for projects, either alone or jointly with another entity, if the authority or a wholly owned subsidiary of the authority maintains majority ownership of a project at all times unless or until the authority terminates its interest in the project consistent with this section. This paragraph shall apply to a project on real property that the authority does not own or in which the authority does not have a property right or interest, subject to agreement by the owner of the real property, right or interest.(22) To provide capital, leverage private capital, provide credit enhancements, facilitate the packaging of savings generated by individual energy management devices into marketable securities, make investments and provide other forms of financial assistance to support the development or deployment of renewable energy resources in this Commonwealth, either directly or by contract with an external administrator acting under the oversight of the authority. The authority or its contractor may invest in or finance projects alone or in conjunction with other investors, including community development financial institutions, insured credit unions, depository institutions and nonprofit organizations that perform lending activities. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the authority nor its contractor may provide typical banking functions or accept deposits other than deposits from repayments and other revenue received from financial assistance 20260HB2347PN3178 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided under this section.(23) To acquire, own, lease or maintain real or other property or property rights or interests necessary for a project.(24) To apply for and receive and assist a public, quasi-public, nonprofit or private entity in applying for and receiving a Federal tax refund generated by the elective payment of an applicable Federal tax credit. The authority may charge a reasonable fee for assistance provided under this paragraph and shall deposit fees collected under this paragraph into the Energy Development Fund for the purposes of the authority.Section 5. Section 2807-C(j) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:SECTION 7. SECTIONS 2807-C(J) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH, 2809-C HEADING, (A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (B) AND 2811-C(A) AND (C) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 2807-C. Authority Indebtedness.--* * *(j) In the event that the authority shall default in the payment of principal [of] or premium, if any, or interest on any issue of bonds after the principal, premium or interest shall become due, whether at maturity, upon call for redemption or otherwise and such default shall continue for a period of thirty days or in the event that the authority shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this act or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of the bonds, the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in aggregate principal amount of the bonds then outstanding of such issues, by instrument or instruments filed in the Office of the Prothonotary of the Commonwealth Court, may appoint a trustee to represent the bondholders for the purpose herein provided. Such trustee and 20260HB2347PN3178 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any trustee under any indenture or other agreement, may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%), or such other percentage as may be specified in any indenture or other agreement aforesaid, in principal amount of the particular issues of bonds then outstanding, shall, in his or its own name:* * *SECTION 2809-C. ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PLAN.--(A) IN ORDER TO DEVISE THE MOST EFFECTIVE STRATEGY FOR PROVIDING THE FINANCIAL AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AUTHORIZED IN THIS ARTICLE, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PUBLISH, WITHIN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS ACT, A PLAN FOR THE ALLOCATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF FINANCIAL AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE. THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PLAN SHALL:* * *(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS AT LOCATIONS THROUGHOUT THE COMMONWEALTH TO RECEIVE COMMENTS UPON AND SUGGESTIONS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PLAN. THESE HEARINGS SHALL BE CONCLUDED WITHIN NINETY DAYS OF THE PUBLICATION OF THE INITIAL PLAN. NOT MORE THAN NINETY DAYS FOLLOWING THE COMPLETION OF HEARINGS, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PROMULGATE ITS FINAL ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PLAN.SECTION 2811-C. FUNDING OF THE AUTHORITY.--(A) THE SUM OF TWO MILLION DOLLARS ($2,000,000) IS HEREBY SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED TO THE AUTHORITY TO BE DEPOSITED IN A SPECIAL ACCOUNT TO BE CREATED IN THE TREASURY OF THE COMMONWEALTH TO BE KNOWN AS THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING FUND. THE FUND SHALL BE USED TO PREPARE THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING PLAN, TO PAY FOR INITIAL ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH INITIAL BOND ISSUES, TO MAKE GRANTS FOR LIMITED RESEARCH, AND PURSUANT 20260HB2347PN3178 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO THIS ACT TO ESTABLISH SUCH RESERVES AS IN THE JUDGMENT OF THE AUTHORITY WITH RESPECT TO LOANS GUARANTEED OR BONDS ISSUED BY THE AUTHORITY MAY BE NECESSARY OR DESIRABLE OR TO ACCOMPLISH ANY OTHER OF ITS CORPORATE PURPOSES.* * *(C) AT ANY TIME THAT THE AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE THAT FUNDS HELD FOR THE CREDIT OF THE ENERGY [DEVELOPMENT] FINANCING FUND ARE IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT NEEDED TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE, THE AUTHORITY SHALL TAKE SUCH ACTION AS SHALL BE REQUIRED TO RELEASE SUCH EXCESS FROM THE FUND AND TRANSFER THE SAME TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE TREASURY.Section 6 8. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2347PN3178 - 12 - <--123456789101112